California statutes. Water Code
(c) The state board shall work with counties, groundwater sustainability agencies, technical assistance
 providers, nonprofit organizations, community-based organizations, and the public to address state small water system and domestic well community drought and emergency water shortage resiliency needs, including both of the following:

(1) Proactive communication to domestic well communities before a drought occurs, such as information on local bottled water and water tank providers.

(2) Funding for installation of basic drought and emergency water shortage resiliency infrastructure, such as well monitoring devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. State Agency Implementation [10609.80. - 10609.80.]

10609.80.

(a) The department shall take both of the following actions to support implementation of the recommendations of its County Drought Advisory Group:

(1) Maintain, in partnership with the state board and other relevant state agencies, the risk vulnerability tool developed as part of the County Drought Advisory Group process and continue to refine existing data and gather new data for the tool, including, but not limited to, data on all of the following:

(A) Small water suppliers and nontransient noncommunity water systems serving a school.

(B) State small water systems and rural communities.

(C) Domestic wells and other self-supplied residents.

(2) Update the risk vulnerability tool for small water suppliers and rural communities periodically, by doing all of the following:

(A) Revise the indicators and construction of the scoring as more data becomes readily available.

(B) Make existing and new data publicly available on the California Open Data internet web portal.

(C) In consultation with other relevant state agencies, identify deficits in data quality and availability and develop recommendations to address these gaps.

(b) (1) The department, in collaboration with the state board and
 relevant state agencies, shall establish a standing interagency drought and water shortage task force to facilitate proactive state planning and coordination, both for predrought planning and postdrought emergency response, to develop strategies to enhance collaboration between various fields, and to consider all types of water users.

(2) The interagency drought and water shortage task force shall include representatives from local governments, community-based organizations, nonprofit technical assistance providers, the public, and experts in land use planning, water resiliency, and water infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 552)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.6. URBAN WATER MANAGEMENT PLANNING [10610. - 10657.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Declaration and Policy [10610. - 10610.4.]

10610.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Urban Water Management Planning Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10610.2.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The waters of the state are a limited and renewable resource subject to ever-increasing demands.

(2) The conservation and efficient use of urban water supplies are of statewide concern; however, the planning for that use and the implementation of those plans can best be accomplished at the local level.

(3) A long-term, reliable supply of water is essential to protect the productivity of California’s businesses and economic climate, and increasing
 long-term water conservation among Californians, improving water use efficiency within the state’s communities and agricultural production, and strengthening local and regional drought planning are critical to California’s resilience to drought and climate change.

(4) As part of its long-range planning activities, every urban water supplier should make every effort to ensure the appropriate level of reliability in its water service sufficient to meet the needs of its various categories of customers during normal, dry, and multiple dry water years now and into the foreseeable future, and every urban water supplier should collaborate closely with local land-use authorities to ensure water demand forecasts are consistent with current land-use planning.

(5) Public health issues have
 been raised over a number of contaminants that have been identified in certain local and imported water supplies.

(6) Implementing effective water management strategies, including groundwater storage projects and recycled water projects, may require specific water quality and salinity targets for meeting groundwater basins water quality objectives and promoting beneficial use of recycled water.

(7) Water quality regulations are becoming an increasingly important factor in water agencies’ selection of raw water sources, treatment alternatives, and modifications to existing treatment facilities.

(8) Changes in drinking water quality standards may also impact the usefulness of water supplies and may ultimately impact
 supply reliability.

(9) The quality of source supplies can have a significant impact on water management strategies and supply reliability.

(b) This part is intended to provide assistance to water agencies in carrying out their long-term resource planning responsibilities to ensure adequate water supplies to meet existing and future demands for water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 18.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10610.4.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of the state as follows:

(a) The management of urban water demands and efficient use of water shall be actively pursued to protect both the people of the state and their water resources.

(b) The management of urban water demands and efficient use of urban water supplies shall be a guiding criterion in public decisions.

(c) Urban water suppliers shall be required to develop water management plans to achieve the efficient use of available supplies and strengthen local drought
 planning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 19.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [10611. - 10618.]

10611.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions of this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10611.3.

“Customer” means a purchaser of water from a water supplier who uses the water for municipal purposes, including residential, commercial, governmental, and industrial uses.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10612 by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 20.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10611.5.

“Demand management” means those water conservation measures, programs, and incentives that prevent the waste of water and promote the reasonable and efficient use and reuse of available supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 854, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10612.

“Drought risk assessment” means a method that examines water shortage risks based on the driest five-year historic sequence for the agency’s water supply, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 10635.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 21.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10613.

“Efficient use” means those management measures that result in the most effective use of water so as to prevent its waste or unreasonable use or unreasonable method of use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10614.

“Person” means any individual, firm, association, organization, partnership, business, trust, corporation, company, public agency, or any agency of such an entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10615.

“Plan” means an urban water management plan prepared pursuant to this part. A plan shall describe and evaluate sources of supply, reasonable and practical efficient uses, reclamation and demand management activities. The components of the plan may vary according to an individual community or area’s characteristics and its capabilities to efficiently use and conserve water. The plan shall address measures for residential, commercial, governmental, and industrial water demand management as set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 10630) of Chapter 3. In addition, a strategy and time schedule for implementation shall be included in the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 854, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10616.

“Public agency” means any board, commission, county, city and county, city, regional agency, district, or other public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10616.5.

‛Recycled water” means the reclamation and reuse of wastewater for beneficial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 854, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10617.

“Urban water supplier” means a supplier, either publicly or privately owned, providing water for municipal purposes either directly or indirectly to more than 3,000 customers or supplying more than 3,000 acre-feet of water annually. An urban water supplier includes a supplier or contractor for water, regardless of the basis of right, which distributes or sells for ultimate resale to customers. This part applies only to water supplied from public water systems subject to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 428.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10617.5.

“Water shortage contingency plan” means a document that incorporates the provisions detailed in subdivision (a) of Section 10632 and is subsequently adopted by an urban water supplier pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 22.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10618.

“Water supply and demand assessment” means a method that looks at current year and one or more dry year supplies and demands for determining water shortage risks, as described in Section 10632.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 23.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Urban Water Management Plans [10620. - 10645.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [10620. - 10621.]

10620.

(a) Every urban water supplier shall prepare and adopt an urban water management plan in the manner set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10640).

(b) Every person that becomes an urban water supplier shall adopt an urban water management plan within one year after it has become an urban water supplier.

(c) An urban water supplier indirectly providing water shall not include planning elements in its water management plan as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 10630) that would be applicable to urban water suppliers or public agencies directly providing water, or to
 their customers, without the consent of those suppliers or public agencies.

(d) (1) An urban water supplier may satisfy the requirements of this part by participation in areawide, regional, watershed, or basinwide urban water management planning where those plans will reduce preparation costs and contribute to the achievement of conservation, efficient water use, and improved local drought resilience.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), each urban water supplier shall develop its own water shortage contingency plan, but an urban water supplier may incorporate, collaborate, and otherwise share information with other urban water suppliers or other governing entities participating in an areawide, regional, watershed, or basinwide urban water management plan, an
 agricultural management plan, or groundwater sustainability plan development.

(3) Each urban water supplier shall coordinate the preparation of its plan with other appropriate agencies in the area, including other water suppliers that share a common source, water management agencies, and relevant public agencies, to the extent practicable.

(e) The urban water supplier may prepare the plan with its own staff, by contract, or in cooperation with other governmental agencies.

(f) An urban water supplier shall describe in the plan water management tools and options used by that entity that will maximize resources and minimize the need to import water from other regions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 24.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10621.

(a) Each urban water supplier shall update its plan at least once every five years on or before July 1, in years ending in six and one, incorporating updated and new information from the five years preceding each update.

(b) Every urban water supplier required to prepare a plan pursuant to this part shall, at least 60 days before the public hearing on the plan required by Section 10642, notify any city or county within which the supplier provides water supplies that the urban water supplier will be reviewing the plan and considering amendments or changes to the plan. The urban water supplier may consult with, and obtain comments from, any city or county that receives notice pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) An urban water supplier regulated by the Public Utilities Commission shall include its most recent plan and water shortage contingency plan as part of the supplier’s general rate case filings.

(d) The amendments to, or changes in, the plan shall be adopted and filed in the manner set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10640).

(e) Each urban water supplier shall update and submit its 2015 plan to the department by July 1, 2016.

(f) Each urban water supplier shall update and submit its 2020 plan to the department by July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 7.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contents of Plans [10630. - 10634.]

10630.

It is the intention of the Legislature, in enacting this part, to permit levels of water management planning commensurate with the numbers of customers served and the volume of water supplied, while accounting for impacts from climate change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 26.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10630.5.

Each plan shall include a simple lay description of how much water the agency has on a reliable basis, how much it needs for the foreseeable future, what the agency’s strategy is for meeting its water needs, the challenges facing the agency, and any other information necessary to provide a general understanding of the agency’s plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 27.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10631.

A plan shall be adopted in accordance with this chapter that shall do all of the following:

(a) Describe the service area of the supplier, including current and projected population, climate, and other social, economic, and demographic factors affecting the supplier’s water management planning. The projected population estimates shall be based upon data from the state, regional, or local service agency population projections within the service area of the urban water supplier and shall be in five-year increments to 20 years or as far as data is available. The description shall include the current and projected land uses within the existing or anticipated service area affecting the supplier’s water management planning. Urban water suppliers shall coordinate with local or regional land use
 authorities to determine the most appropriate land use information, including, where appropriate, land use information obtained from local or regional land use authorities, as developed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 65300) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(b) Identify and quantify, to the extent practicable, the existing and planned sources of water available to the supplier over the same five-year increments described in subdivision (a), providing supporting and related information, including all of the following:

(1) A detailed discussion of anticipated supply availability under a normal water year, single dry year, and droughts lasting at least five years, as well as more frequent and severe periods of drought, as described in the drought risk assessment. For each source of water supply, consider any information pertinent to the
 reliability analysis conducted pursuant to Section 10635, including changes in supply due to climate change.

(2) When multiple sources of water supply are identified, a description of the management of each supply in correlation with the other identified supplies.

(3) For any planned sources of water supply, a description of the measures that are being undertaken to acquire and develop those water supplies.

(4) If groundwater is identified as an existing or planned source of water available to the supplier, all of the following information:

(A) The current version of any groundwater sustainability plan or alternative adopted pursuant to Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720), any groundwater management plan adopted by the urban water supplier,
 including plans adopted pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750), or any other specific authorization for groundwater management for basins underlying the urban water supplier’s service area.

(B) A description of any groundwater basin or basins from which the urban water supplier pumps groundwater. For basins that a court or the board has adjudicated the rights to pump groundwater, a copy of the order or decree adopted by the court or the board and a description of the amount of groundwater the urban water supplier has the legal right to pump under the order or decree. For a basin that has not been adjudicated, information as to whether the department has identified the basin as a high- or medium-priority basin in the most current official departmental bulletin that characterizes the condition of the groundwater basin, and a detailed description of the efforts being undertaken by the urban water supplier to coordinate with
 groundwater sustainability agencies or groundwater management agencies listed in subdivision (c) of Section 10723 to maintain or achieve sustainable groundwater conditions in accordance with a groundwater sustainability plan or alternative adopted pursuant to Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720).

(C) A detailed description and analysis of the location, amount, and sufficiency of groundwater pumped by the urban water supplier for the past five years. The description and analysis shall be based on information that is reasonably available, including, but not limited to, historic use records.

(D) A detailed description and analysis of the amount and location of groundwater that is projected to be pumped by the urban water supplier. The description and analysis shall be based on information that is reasonably available, including, but not limited to, historic use records.

(c) Describe the opportunities for exchanges or transfers of water on a short-term or long-term basis.

(d) (1) For an urban retail water supplier, quantify, to the extent records are available, past and current water use, over the same five-year increments described in subdivision (a), and projected water use, based upon information developed pursuant to subdivision (a), identifying the uses among water use sectors, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) Single-family residential.

(B) Multifamily.

(C) Commercial.

(D) Industrial.

(E) Institutional and governmental.

(F) Landscape.

(G) Sales to other agencies.

(H) Saline water intrusion barriers, groundwater recharge, or conjunctive use, or any combination thereof.

(I) Agricultural.

(J) Distribution system water loss.

(2) The water use projections shall be in the same five-year increments described in subdivision (a).

(3) (A) The distribution system water loss shall be quantified for each of the five years preceding the plan update, in accordance with rules
 adopted pursuant to Section 10608.34.

(B) The distribution system water loss quantification shall be reported in accordance with a worksheet approved or developed by the department through a public process. The water loss quantification worksheet shall be based on the water system balance methodology developed by the American Water Works Association.

(C) In the plan due July 1, 2021, and in each update thereafter, data shall be included to show whether the urban retail water supplier met the distribution loss standards enacted by the board pursuant to Section 10608.34.

(4) (A) Water use projections, where available, shall display and account for the water savings estimated to result from adopted codes, standards, ordinances, or transportation and land use plans identified by the urban water
 supplier, as applicable to the service area.

(B) To the extent that an urban water supplier reports the information described in subparagraph (A), an urban water supplier shall do both of the following:

(i) Provide citations of the various codes, standards, ordinances, or transportation and land use plans utilized in making the projections.

(ii) Indicate the extent that the water use projections consider savings from codes, standards, ordinances, or transportation and land use plans. Water use projections that do not account for these water savings shall be noted of that fact.

(e) Provide a description of the supplier’s water demand management measures. This description shall include all of the following:

(1) (A) For an urban retail water supplier, as defined in Section 10608.12, a narrative description that addresses the nature and extent of each water demand management measure implemented over the past five years. The narrative shall describe the water demand management measures that the supplier plans to implement to achieve its water use targets pursuant to Section 10608.20.

(B) The narrative pursuant to this paragraph shall include descriptions of the following water demand management measures:

(i) Water waste prevention ordinances.

(ii) Metering.

(iii) Conservation pricing.

(iv) Public education and
 outreach.

(v) Programs to assess and manage distribution system real loss.

(vi) Water conservation program coordination and staffing support.

(vii) Other demand management measures that have a significant impact on water use as measured in gallons per capita per day, including innovative measures, if implemented.

(2) For an urban wholesale water supplier, as defined in Section 10608.12, a narrative description of the items in clauses (ii), (iv), (vi), and (vii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), and a narrative description of its distribution system asset management and wholesale supplier assistance programs.

(f) Include a description of all water supply projects and water supply
 programs that may be undertaken by the urban water supplier to meet the total projected water use, as established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10635. The urban water supplier shall include a detailed description of expected future projects and programs that the urban water supplier may implement to increase the amount of the water supply available to the urban water supplier in normal and single-dry water years and for a period of drought lasting five consecutive water years. The description shall identify specific projects and include a description of the increase in water supply that is expected to be available from each project. The description shall include an estimate with regard to the implementation timeline for each project or program.

(g) Describe the opportunities for development of desalinated water, including, but not limited to, ocean water, brackish water, and groundwater, as a long-term supply.

(h) An urban water supplier that relies upon a wholesale agency for a source of water shall provide the wholesale agency with water use projections from that agency for that source of water in five-year increments to 20 years or as far as data is available. The wholesale agency shall provide information to the urban water supplier for inclusion in the urban water supplier’s plan that identifies and quantifies, to the extent practicable, the existing and planned sources of water as required by subdivision (b), available from the wholesale agency to the urban water supplier over the same five-year increments, and during various water-year types in accordance with subdivision (f). An urban water supplier may rely upon water supply information provided by the wholesale agency in fulfilling the plan informational requirements of subdivisions (b) and (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 8.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10631.1.

(a) The water use projections required by Section 10631 shall include projected water use for single-family and multifamily residential housing needed for lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, as identified in the housing element of any city, county, or city and county in the service area of the supplier.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the identification of projected water use for single-family and multifamily residential housing for lower income households will assist a supplier in complying with the requirement under Section 65589.7 of the Government Code to grant a priority for the provision of service to housing units affordable to lower income households.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 727, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10631.2.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 10631, an urban water management plan shall include any of the following information that the urban water supplier can readily obtain:

(1) An estimate of the amount of energy used to extract or divert water supplies.

(2) An estimate of the amount of energy used to convey water supplies to the water treatment plants or distribution systems.

(3) An estimate of the amount of energy used to treat water supplies.

(4) An estimate of the amount of energy used to
 distribute water supplies through its distribution systems.

(5) An estimate of the amount of energy used for treated water supplies in comparison to the amount used for nontreated water supplies.

(6) An estimate of the amount of energy used to place water into or withdraw from storage.

(7) Any other energy-related information the urban water supplier deems appropriate.

(b) The department shall include in its guidance for the preparation of urban water management plans a methodology for the voluntary calculation or estimation of the energy intensity of urban water systems. The department may consider studies and calculations conducted by the Public
 Utilities Commission in developing the methodology.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that energy use is only one factor in water supply planning and shall not be considered independently of other factors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 29.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10632.

(a) Every urban water supplier shall prepare and adopt a water shortage contingency plan as part of its urban water management plan that consists of each of the following elements:

(1) The analysis of water supply reliability conducted pursuant to Section 10635.

(2) The procedures used in conducting an annual water supply and demand assessment that include, at a minimum, both of the following:

(A) The written decisionmaking process that an urban water supplier will use each year to determine its water supply reliability.

(B) The key data inputs and assessment methodology used to evaluate the urban water supplier’s water supply reliability for the current year and one dry year, including all of the following:

(i) Current year unconstrained demand, considering weather, growth, and other influencing factors, such as policies to manage current supplies to meet demand objectives in future years, as applicable.

(ii) Current year available supply, considering hydrological and regulatory conditions in the current year and one
 dry year. The annual supply and demand assessment may consider more than one dry year solely at the discretion of the urban water supplier.

(iii) Existing infrastructure capabilities and plausible constraints.

(iv) A defined set of locally applicable evaluation criteria that are consistently relied upon for each annual water supply and demand assessment.

(v) A description and quantification of each source of water supply.

(3) (A) Six standard water shortage levels corresponding to progressive ranges of up to 10, 20, 30, 40, and 50 percent shortages and greater than 50 percent shortage. Urban water suppliers shall define
 these shortage levels based on the suppliers’ water supply conditions, including percentage reductions in water supply, changes in groundwater levels, changes in surface elevation or level of subsidence, or other changes in hydrological or other local conditions indicative of the water supply available for use. Shortage levels shall also apply to catastrophic interruption of water supplies, including, but not limited to, a regional power outage, an earthquake, and other potential emergency events.

(B) An urban water supplier with an existing water shortage contingency plan that uses different water shortage levels may comply with the requirement in subparagraph (A) by developing and including a cross-reference relating its existing categories to the six standard water shortage levels.

(4) Shortage response actions that align with the defined shortage levels and include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) Locally appropriate supply augmentation actions.

(B) Locally appropriate demand reduction actions to adequately respond to shortages.

(C) Locally appropriate operational changes.

(D) Additional, mandatory prohibitions against specific water use practices that are in addition to state-mandated prohibitions and appropriate to the local conditions.

(E) For each action, an estimate of the extent to which the gap between supplies and demand will be reduced by implementation of
 the action.

(5) Communication protocols and procedures to inform customers, the public, interested parties, and local, regional, and state governments, regarding, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) Any current or predicted shortages as determined by the annual water supply and demand assessment described pursuant to Section 10632.1.

(B) Any shortage response actions triggered or anticipated to be triggered by the annual water supply and demand assessment described pursuant to Section 10632.1.

(C) Any other relevant communications.

(6) For an urban retail water supplier, customer compliance, enforcement,
 appeal, and exemption procedures for triggered shortage response actions as determined pursuant to Section 10632.2.

(7) (A) A description of the legal authorities that empower the urban water supplier to implement and enforce its shortage response actions specified in paragraph (4) that may include, but are not limited to, statutory authorities, ordinances, resolutions, and contract provisions.

(B) A statement that an urban water supplier shall declare a water shortage emergency in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 350) of Division 1.

(C) A statement that an urban water supplier shall coordinate with any city or county within which it provides water supply services for the
 possible proclamation of a local emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(8) A description of the financial consequences of, and responses for, drought conditions, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) A description of potential revenue reductions and expense increases associated with activated shortage response actions described in paragraph (4).

(B) A description of mitigation actions needed to address revenue reductions and expense increases associated with activated shortage response actions described in paragraph (4).

(C) A description of the cost of compliance with Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 365) of
 Division 1.

(9) For an urban retail water supplier, monitoring and reporting requirements and procedures that ensure appropriate data is collected, tracked, and analyzed for purposes of monitoring customer compliance and to meet state reporting requirements.

(10) Reevaluation and improvement procedures for systematically monitoring and evaluating the functionality of the water shortage contingency plan in order to ensure shortage risk tolerance is adequate and appropriate water shortage mitigation strategies are implemented as needed.

(b) For purposes of developing the water shortage contingency plan pursuant to subdivision (a), an urban water supplier shall analyze and define water features that are artificially supplied with
 water, including ponds, lakes, waterfalls, and fountains, separately from swimming pools and spas, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 115921 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The urban water supplier shall make available the water shortage contingency plan prepared pursuant to this article to its customers and any city or county within which it provides water supplies no later than 30 days after adoption of the water shortage contingency plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 32.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10632.1.

An urban water supplier shall conduct an annual water supply and demand assessment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10632 and, on or before July 1 of each year, submit an annual water shortage assessment report to the department with information for anticipated shortage, triggered shortage response actions, compliance and enforcement actions, and communication actions consistent with the supplier’s water shortage contingency plan. An urban water supplier that relies on imported water from the State Water Project or the Bureau of Reclamation shall submit its annual water supply and demand assessment within 14 days of receiving its final allocations, or by July 1 of each year, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 9.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10632.2.

An urban water supplier shall follow, where feasible and appropriate, the prescribed procedures and implement determined shortage response actions in its water shortage contingency plan, as identified in subdivision (a) of Section 10632, or reasonable alternative actions, provided that descriptions of the alternative actions are submitted with the annual water shortage assessment report pursuant to Section 10632.1. Nothing in this section prohibits an urban water supplier from taking actions not specified in its water shortage contingency plan, if needed, without having to formally amend its urban water management plan or water shortage contingency plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 34.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10632.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, upon proclamation by the Governor of a state of emergency under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) based on drought conditions, the board defer to implementation of locally adopted water shortage contingency plans to the extent practicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 35.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10632.5.

(a) In addition to the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10632, beginning January 1, 2020, the plan shall include a seismic risk assessment and mitigation plan to assess the vulnerability of each of the various facilities of a water system and mitigate those vulnerabilities.

(b) An urban water supplier shall update the seismic risk assessment and mitigation plan when updating its urban water management plan as required by Section 10621.

(c) An urban water supplier may comply with this section by submitting, pursuant to Section 10644, a copy of the most recent adopted local hazard mitigation plan or multihazard mitigation plan under the federal Disaster Mitigation Act of 2000 (Public Law 106-390) if the local hazard mitigation plan or multihazard mitigation plan addresses seismic risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 681, Sec. 1.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10633.

The plan shall provide, to the extent available, information on recycled water and its potential for use as a water source in the service area of the urban water supplier. The preparation of the plan shall be coordinated with local water, wastewater, groundwater, and planning agencies that operate within the supplier’s service area, and shall include all of the following:

(a) A description of the wastewater collection and treatment systems in the supplier’s service area, including a quantification of the amount of wastewater collected and treated and the methods of wastewater disposal.

(b) A description of the quantity of treated wastewater that meets recycled water standards, is
 being discharged, and is otherwise available for use in a recycled water project.

(c) A description of the recycled water currently being used in the supplier’s service area, including, but not limited to, the type, place, and quantity of use.

(d) A description and quantification of the potential uses of recycled water, including, but not limited to, agricultural irrigation, landscape irrigation, wildlife habitat enhancement, wetlands, industrial reuse, groundwater recharge, indirect potable reuse, and other appropriate uses, and a determination with regard to the technical and economic feasibility of serving those uses.

(e) The projected use of recycled water within the supplier’s service area at the end of 5,
 10, 15, and 20 years, and a description of the actual use of recycled water in comparison to uses previously projected pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) A description of actions, including financial incentives, which may be taken to encourage the use of recycled water, and the projected results of these actions in terms of acre-feet of recycled water used per year.

(g) A plan for optimizing the use of recycled water in the supplier’s service area, including actions to facilitate the installation of dual distribution systems, to promote recirculating uses, to facilitate the increased use of treated wastewater that meets recycled water standards, and to overcome any obstacles to achieving that increased use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 534, Sec. 2.   (AB 1465)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10634.
